Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.617

Prenatal nutrition best practices—Educational resources for pregnant women.

The department shall develop and make available educational resources for pregnant women regarding prenatal nutrition best practices to promote infant health. The educational resources may include, but are not limited to, courses delivered in-person or electronically and pamphlets printed on paper or made available on the department's website. The educational resources are intended to provide pregnant women knowledge of healthy foods and essential daily nutrients needed to promote infant growth and development.

[ 2014 c 38 s 1.]